Washington statutes.
RCW 18.300.030

License required to be in good standing.

(1) It is unlawful for any person to engage in a practice listed in subsection (2) of this section unless the person has a license in good standing as required by this chapter. A license issued under this chapter is considered to be "in good standing" except when:

(a) The license has expired or has been canceled and has not been renewed in accordance with RCW 18.300.050;

(b) The license has been denied, revoked, or suspended under RCW 18.300.110 or 18.300.130, and has not been reinstated; or

(c) The license is held by a person who has not fully complied with an order of the director issued under RCW 18.300.110 requiring the licensee to pay restitution or a fine, or to acquire additional training.

(2) The director may take action under RCW 18.235.150 and 18.235.160 against any person who does any of the following without first obtaining, and maintaining in good standing, the license required by this chapter:

(a) Engages in the practice of body art, body piercing, or tattooing; or

(b) Operates a shop or business.

[ 2009 c 412 s 4.]